fr: Type de fibre de soie: Soie Ahimsa (sans cruauté); Soie Eri; Soie Muga; Soie de mûrier; Autre/non spécifié; Soie d’araignée; Soie Tussah (sauvage); Autre
da: Silkefibertype: Ahimsa-silke (fredssilke); Eri-silke; Muga-silke; Morbærsilke; Andet/uspecificeret; Edderkoppesilke; Tussah-silke (vildsilke); Andet
cs: Typ hedvábného vlákna: Hedvábí ahimsa (mírové); Hedvábí eri; Hedvábí muga; Morušové hedvábí; Jiný/nespecifikovaný; Pavoučí hedvábí; Hedvábí tussah (plané); Jiný
sk-SK: Typ hodvábneho vlákna: Hodváb Ahimsa (mierový); Hodváb Eri; Hodváb Muga; Morušový hodváb; Iné/nešpecifikované; Pavúčí hodváb; Hodváb Tussah (divoký); Iné
lt-LT: Šilko pluošto tipas: „Ahimsa“ (taikos) šilkas; „Eri“ šilkas; „Muga“ šilkas; Šilkmedžio šilkas; Kita / nenurodyta; Voro šilkas; Tuso (laukinis) šilkas; Kita
zh-CN: 丝纤维类型: 非暴力（和平）丝; 伊里丝; 穆加丝; 桑蚕丝; 其他/未指定; 蜘蛛丝; 柞蚕（野）丝; 其他
fi: Silkkikuidun tyyppi: Ahimsa-silkki (rauhansilkki); Eri-silkki; Muga-silkki; Mulperisilkki; Muu/määrittelemätön; Hämähäkkisilkki; Tussah-silkki (villi); Muu
ru: Тип шелкового волокна: Шелк ахимса (мирный шелк); Шелк эри; Шелк муга; Малбери (тутовый шелк); Другое/не указано; Паучий шелк; Тусса (дикий шелк); Другое
el: Τύπος ινών μεταξιού: Μετάξι Ahimsa (ειρήνης); Μετάξι Eri; Μετάξι Muga; Μετάξι μουριάς; Άλλο/μη καθορισμένο; Μετάξι αράχνης; Μετάξι Tussah (άγριο); Άλλο
hu: Selyemszál típusa: Ahimsa (béke) selyem; Eri selyem; Muga selyem; Eperfa selyem; Egyéb/nem meghatározott; Pókselyem; Tussah (vad) selyem; Egyéb
de: Seidenfasertyp: Ahimsa-Seide (Friedensseide); Eri-Seide; Muga-Seide; Maulbeerseide; Andere/Nicht angegeben; Spinnenseide; Tussahseide (Wildseide); Andere
es: Tipo de fibra de seda: Seda Ahimsa (seda de la paz); Seda Eri; Seda Muga; Seda de morera; Otro/no especificado; Seda de araña; Seda Tussah (salvaje); Otro
it: Tipo di fibra di seta: Seta Ahimsa (non violenta); Seta Eri; Seta Muga; Seta di gelso; Altro/non specificato; Seta di ragno; Seta Tussah (selvatica); Altro
nl: Zijde vezeltype: Ahimsa-zijde (vredeszijde); Eri-zijde; Muga-zijde; Moerbeizijde; Overig/ongespecificeerd; Spinnenzijde; Tussahzijde (wilde zijde); Overig
ro-RO: Tipul de fibră de mătase: Mătase Ahimsa (mătasea păcii); Mătase Eri; Mătase Muga; Mătase Mulberry; Altul/nespecificat; Mătase de păianjen; Mătase Tussah (sălbatică); Altul
tr: İpek elyaf türü: Ahimsa (barış) ipeği; Eri ipeği; Muga ipeği; Dut ipeği; Diğer/belirtilmemiş; Örümcek ipeği; Tussah (yabani) ipeği; Diğer
bg-BG: Вид копринени влакна: Коприна Ахимса (мирна коприна); Коприна Ери; Коприна Муга; Черничева коприна; Друг/неопределен; Паяжинна коприна; Коприна Туса (дива); Друг
pt-PT: Tipo de fibra de seda: Seda Ahimsa (da paz); Seda Eri; Seda Muga; Seda de amoreira; Outro/não especificado; Seda de aranha; Seda Tussah (selvagem); Outro
zh-TW: 絲纖維類型: 無殺生 (和平) 蠶絲; 蓖麻蠶絲; 姆加蠶絲; 桑蠶絲; 其他/未指定; 蜘蛛絲; 柞蠶 (野) 絲; 其他
pt-BR: Fibra de seda tipo: Seda Ahimsa (da paz); Seda Eri; Seda Muga; Seda amoreira; Outra/não especificada; Seda de aranha; Seda Tussah (selvagem); Outra
nb: Silkefibertype: Ahimsa-silke (fredssilke); Eri-silke; Muga-silke; Mulbærsilke; Annet / uspesifisert; Edderkoppsilke; Tussah-silke (villsilke); Annet
sv: Silkesfibertyp: Ahimsa (freds)-silke; Eri-silke; Muga-silke; Mullbärssilke; Annat/ospecificerat; Spindelsilke; Tussah (vilt) silke; Övrigt
hr-HR: Vrsta svilenih vlakana: Ahimsa (mirna) svila; Eri svila; Muga svila; Dudova svila; Ostalo/neodređeno; Paukova svila; Tussah (divlja) svila; Ostalo
en: Silk fiber type: Ahimsa (peace) silk; Eri silk; Muga silk; Mulberry silk; Other/unspecified; Spider silk; Tussah (wild) silk; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta svilenih vlaken: Svila ahimsa; Svila eri; Svila muga; Murvina svila; Drugo/nedoločeno; Pajkova svila; Svila tussah (divja svila); Drugo
ja: シルク繊維の種類: アヒンサー (ピース) シルク; エリシルク; ムガシルク; マルベリーシルク; その他/指定なし; スパイダーシルク; タッサー (野蚕) シルク; その他
vi: Loại sợi tơ tằm: Lụa Ahimsa (lụa hòa bình); Lụa Eri; Lụa Muga; Lụa tơ tằm dâu; Khác/không xác định; Tơ nhện; Lụa tơ tằm hoang dã (Tussah); Khác
pl: Rodzaj włókna jedwabiu: Jedwab Ahimsa (peace silk); Jedwab Eri; Jedwab Muga; Jedwab morwowy; Inny/nieokreślony; Jedwab pajęczy; Jedwab Tussah (dziki); Inne
th: เส้นใยไหมชนิด: ไหมอหิงสา (ไหมสันติภาพ); ไหมอีรี่; ไหมมูก้า; ไหมหม่อน; อื่นๆ/ไม่ระบุ; ใยแมงมุม; ไหมทัสซาฮ์ (ไหมป่า); อื่นๆ
ko: 실크 섬유 유형: 아힘사(피스) 실크; 에리 실크; 무가 실크; 멀베리 실크; 기타/미지정; 거미줄 실크; 투사(야생) 실크; 기타